District of Columbia statutes.
42-3102

Action to abate.

(a)

Wherever there is reason to believe that a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance exists, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, the Corporation Counsel for the District of Columbia, or any community-based organization may file an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to abate, enjoin, and prevent the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance.

(b)

Such actions shall be commenced by the filing of a complaint in the Civil Branch of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia against any person alleging the facts constituting the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance.

(c)

Such actions shall be in equity and shall be tried without a jury.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 3, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591
1981 Ed., § 45-3302.
D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.